Louisiana, session 2026, HB358.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The portion of Louisiana Highway 433 in Slidell, Louisiana, beginning
at the intersection of Louisiana Highway 433 and Vaultz Road and ending at the intersection
of Louisiana Highway 433 and Pinehurst Boulevard, shall be known and is hereby
designated as the "Charles R. Bordelon, Sr., Memorial Highway".
Section 2. The Department of Transportation and Development or its contractors are
hereby directed to erect and maintain appropriate signage reflecting this designation
approximately eight hundred fifty feet west of Marilyn Drive and facing traffic traveling
southeast, provided local or private monies are received by the department equal to the
department's actual costs for material, fabrication, mounting posts, and installation of the
signage, not to exceed the sum of seven hundred fifty dollars per sign.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1